dictionaries/zu_ZA/zu_ZA.aff
PFX N Y 145
PFX N 0 0 a POSSESSIVE
PFX N a 0 . DEMONSTRATED/ADDRESSED
PFX N i 0 i[^-] DEMONSTRATED/ADDRESSED
PFX N i- 0 . DEMONSTRATED/ADDRESSED
PFX N u 0 u[^-] DEMONSTRATED/ADDRESSED
PFX N u- 0 . DEMONSTRATED/ADDRESSED
PFX N 0 aban a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i abane i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 abang/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 abang/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u abano u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 abaw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 abay/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 an a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i ane i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ang/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ang/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u ano u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 aw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ay/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 b a POSSESSIVE
PFX N i be i POSSESSIVE
PFX N u bo u POSSESSIVE
PFX N i e i POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 elin a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i eline i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eling/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eling/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u elino u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eliw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eliy/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 en a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i ene i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eng/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eng/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 engin a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i engine i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 enging/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 enging/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u engino u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 engiw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 engiy/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 enin a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i enine i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ening/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ening/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u enino u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eniw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eniy/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u eno u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 esin a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i esine i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 esing/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 esing/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u esino u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 esiw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 esiy/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ew/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ey/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ezin a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i ezine i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ezing/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ezing/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u ezino u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eziw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 eziy/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u ko u COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE
PFX N u ko u POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 kw a COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE
PFX N 0 kw a POSSESSIVE
PFX N i kwe i COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE
PFX N i kwe i POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 l a POSSESSIVE
PFX N i le i POSSESSIVE
PFX N u lo u POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 lw a POSSESSIVE
PFX N i lwe i POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 n/s a ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 n/nY a NEG_ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i na/nY i NEG_ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u na/nY u NEG_ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 nang [ou] ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 nang a ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 naw [ou] ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 nay i ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i ne/s i ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ng/s [ou] IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ng/nY [ou] NEG_IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ng/s a IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ng a INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE
PFX N 0 ng/nY a NEG_IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ngang/sY a COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE
PFX N i ngange/sY i COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE
PFX N u ngango/sY u COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE
PFX N i nge i INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE
PFX N u ngo u INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE
PFX N 0 njeng a COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE
PFX N i njenge i COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE
PFX N u njengo u COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE
PFX N u no/s u ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u o u POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 obun a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i obune i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 obung/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 obung/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u obuno u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 obuw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 obuy/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 okun a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i okune i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 okung/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 okung/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u okuno u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 okuw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 okuy/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 olun a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i olune i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 olung/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 olung/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u oluno u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 oluw/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 oluy/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 on a QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i one i QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ong/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ong/s a RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N u ono u QUALIFICATIVE+ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 ow/s [ou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 oy/s i RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 s a POSSESSIVE
PFX N i se i POSSESSIVE
PFX N u so u POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 w/s [ou] IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 w/nY [ou] NEG_IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 w a POSSESSIVE
PFX N i we i POSSESSIVE
PFX N u wo u POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 y a POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 y/s i IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N 0 y/nY i NEG_IDENTIFICATIVE_COPULATIVE
PFX N i ye i POSSESSIVE
PFX N u yo u POSSESSIVE
PFX N 0 z a POSSESSIVE
PFX N i ze i POSSESSIVE
PFX N u zo u POSSESSIVE
